California statutes. Education Code
(a) The partnership shall establish a statewide school safety cadre for the purpose of facilitating interagency coordination and collaboration among school districts, county offices of education, agencies serving youth, allied agencies, community-based organizations, and law enforcement agencies to improve school attendance, encourage good citizenship, and to reduce school violence, school crime, including hate crimes, vandalism, drug and alcohol abuse, gang membership and gang violence, truancy rates, bullying, including acts that are committed personally or by means of an electronic act, teen relationship violence, and discrimination and harassment, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment.

(b) The partnership may appoint up to 100 professionals from educational agencies, community-based organizations, allied agencies, and law enforcement to the statewide cadre.

(c) The partnership shall provide training to the statewide cadre representatives to enable them to initiate and maintain school community safety programs among school districts, county offices of education, agencies serving youth, allied agencies, community-based organizations, and law enforcement agencies in each region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 646, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Program Assessment [32275. - 32275.]

32275.

The partnership shall annually assess the programs and activities under the Interagency School Safety Demonstration Act of 1985. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) An assessment of the appropriateness and effectiveness of the statewide conferences conducted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 32265).

(b) An assessment of the extent to which the statewide school safety cadre has been able to provide appropriate technical assistance to school districts, county offices of education, and law enforcement agencies.

(c) An assessment of the effectiveness of the ongoing training on safe schools and crisis response provided pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 32270.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 32295 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. School Safety Plans [32280. - 32289.6.]

32280.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all California public schools teaching kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, operated by a school district, in cooperation with local law enforcement agencies, community leaders, parents, pupils, teachers, administrators, classified employees, local emergency medical services personnel, the school’s public entity risk pool joint powers authority or insurance provider, and other persons who may be interested in the health and safety of pupils and the prevention of campus crime and violence, develop a comprehensive school safety plan that addresses the safety concerns identified through a systematic planning process.

(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that all school staff be trained on the
 comprehensive school safety plan.

(c) For the purposes of this section, law enforcement agencies include local police departments, county sheriffs’ offices, school district police or security departments, probation departments, and district attorneys’ offices.

(d) For purposes of this section, a “safety plan” means a plan to develop strategies aimed at the prevention of, response to, and education about, potential incidents involving medical emergencies, including sudden cardiac arrest, and crime and violence on the school campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 2.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

32280.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2030, each public school, including charter schools, with an enrollment of 100 pupils or more is encouraged to implement a web-based or app-based school safety program that includes the following program parameters:

(1) A common alphanumeric grid mapping system for the identification of all buildings and locations upon the schoolsite that is replicable across all schoolsites in the state, with each building within the mapped system having conspicuous signage upon all corners of the structure listing the alphanumeric identification and any other pertinent information.

(2) A
 multilayered digital map of the schoolsite that contains key information, including, but not limited to, detailed building floor plans, alphanumeric building identification, gate locations, shut-off valve locations, first aid equipment locations, automated external defibrillator locations, links to 360-degree interior and 360-degree aerial photography, and the location of, and field of view of, schoolsite surveillance cameras.

(3) The ability to place time stamped event markers on the digital map that identify important information about a crisis, including, but not limited to, injuries, hazards, suspect sightings, and safety zones.

(4) (A) The ability to alert first
 responders from multiple agencies within a reasonable geographic area from the school in the event of an emergency on or around the schoolsite.

(B) A designated schoolsite administrator or staff member may request law enforcement assistance using the web-based or app-based school safety program only when there is a situation involving imminent danger of serious physical injury or death to a person on school property, and shall not request law enforcement assistance in a situation that can be safely and appropriately handled by the school’s internal pupil disciplinary procedures, even if a parent or guardian requests the designated schoolsite administrator or staff member to request law enforcement assistance. A parent or guardian who requests the designated schoolsite administrator or staff member to request law enforcement assistance when there
 is no imminent danger of serious physical injury or death to a person on school property shall be informed that school policy requires alternative measures to be taken to respond to the situation. The designated schoolsite administrator or staff member shall provide the parent or guardian with a list of alternative measures that may be taken to respond to the situation, along with any community resources that may be used, as appropriate.

(5) (A) Remote access for first responders to connect to a schoolsite’s surveillance system, with each camera having alphanumeric identification, displaying the direction of the camera’s view, and including a brief description of what is seen within the camera’s field of view.

(B) First responders may connect to a schoolsite’s surveillance system only when a designated schoolsite administrator or staff member requests law enforcement assistance for a situation involving imminent danger of serious physical injury or death to a person on school property.

(6) Detailed schoolsite information, including, but not limited to,
 both of the following:

 (A) The general schoolsite location, schoolsite size, pupil populations, the schoolsite’s grade levels, and the number of staff on campus.

 (B) The
 schoolsite’s Wi-Fi connection information, a hierarchy representation of those with responsibility duties, including their name, title, photograph, and contact information, and the emergency procedures for that schoolsite.

(7) (A) The ability for school administrators to know the location and condition of pupils and staff through an information relay built into the application in order to allow for schoolsite staff to designate pupils as “absent,” “present,” “missing,” “injured,” and “reconnect,” based upon their accurate accounting, with the “reconnect” feature including a messaging system that notifies each pupil’s emergency contacts when that pupil has been safely secured by an authorized emergency
 contact.

(B) The web-based or app-based school safety program shall not use biometric information or require pupils or staff to use or install an app that provides real-time location tracking.

(8) A one-directional message service that allows the program director and the schoolsite primary contact to keep schoolsite staff up to date with current, urgent details.

(9) The ability to operate the program to conduct emergency practice drills and archive dates, times, and comments related to an emergency practice drill.

(b) If a school implements a web-based or app-based school safety program
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the school shall ensure that the program developers ensure that best practices are implemented to protect the security and data of all pupils and staff listed within the program.
 The program developers shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Consult with the department to ensure that the best practices and requirements described in this section are met.

(2) Comply with the Student Online Personal Information Protection Act (Chapter 22.2 (commencing with Section 22584) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code).

(3) Comply with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(4) Make the contract between the school and the program developers publicly available.

(5) Make the best practices
 followed by the program developers publicly available.

(c) This section does not preclude the governing board or body of a local educational agency from implementing more stringent or additional requirements regarding school safety programs.

(d) Paragraphs (1) and (2) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of, subdivision (a), contain sensitive and tactical response information that is critical to the safety and well-being of public schools and their pupils. Therefore, the information
 in paragraphs (1) and (2) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of, subdivision (a), shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise required for purposes of implementing the section, and shall be exempt from any school safety plan disclosure requirements under this article and from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Biometric information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.

(2) “Imminent danger of serious physical injury or death” means that
 based on the totality of the circumstances, a reasonable person in the same situation would believe that an individual has the present ability, opportunity, and apparent intent to immediately cause serious physical injury or death to a person. “Imminent danger of serious physical injury or death” is not merely a fear of future harm, no matter how great the fear or likelihood of the harm, but is a fear of future harm that, from appearances, must be instantly confronted and addressed.

(3) “Serious physical injury” means bodily injury that involves a substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   (AB 960)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

32281.

(a) Each school district and county office of education is responsible for the overall development of all comprehensive school safety plans for its schools operating kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) with regard to a small school district, the schoolsite council established pursuant to former Section 52012, as it existed before July 1, 2005, or Section 52852 shall write and develop a comprehensive school safety plan relevant to the needs and resources of that particular school.

(2) The schoolsite council may delegate this responsibility to a school safety planning committee made up of the following members:

(A) The principal or the principal’s designee.

(B) One teacher who is a representative of the recognized certificated employee organization.

(C) One parent whose child attends the school.

(D) One classified employee who is a representative of the recognized classified employee organization.

(E) Other members, if desired.

(3) The schoolsite council shall consult with a representative from a law enforcement agency, a fire department, and other first responder entities in the writing and development of the comprehensive school safety plan. The comprehensive school safety plan and any updates to the plan shall be shared with the law
 enforcement agency, the fire department, and the other first responder entities.

(4) In the absence of a schoolsite council, the members specified in paragraph (2) shall serve as the school safety planning committee.

(c) This article does not limit or take away the authority of school boards as guaranteed under this code.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to a small school district if the small school district develops a districtwide comprehensive school safety plan that is applicable to each schoolsite.

(e) (1) When a principal or their designee verifies through local law enforcement officials that a report has been filed of the occurrence of a violent crime or sex offense on the schoolsite of an elementary or secondary school
 at which they are the principal, the principal or the principal’s designee may send to each pupil’s parent or legal guardian and each school employee a written notice of the occurrence and general nature of the crime. If the principal or their designee chooses to send the written notice, the Legislature encourages the notice be sent no later than the end of business on the second regular workday after the verification. If, at the time of verification, local law enforcement officials determine that notification of the violent crime or sex offense would hinder an ongoing investigation, the notification authorized by this subdivision shall be made within a reasonable period of time, to be determined by the local law enforcement agency and the school district.

(2) This subdivision does not create any liability in a school district or their employees for complying with paragraph (1).

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a school district or county office of education may, in consultation with law enforcement officials, elect to not have its schoolsite council develop and write those portions of its comprehensive school safety plan that include tactical responses to criminal incidents that may result in death or serious bodily injury at the schoolsite. The portions of a comprehensive school safety plan that include tactical responses to criminal incidents may be developed by administrators of the school district or county office of education in consultation with law enforcement officials and with a representative of an exclusive bargaining unit of employees of that school district or county office of education, if the representative chooses to participate. The school district or county office of education may elect not to disclose those portions of the comprehensive school safety plan that include tactical responses to criminal incidents.

(2) As used in this article, “tactical responses to criminal incidents” means steps taken to safeguard pupils and staff, to secure the affected school premises, and to apprehend the criminal perpetrator or perpetrators.

(3) This subdivision does not preclude the governing board of a school district or county office of education from conferring in a closed session with law enforcement officials pursuant to Section 54957 of the Government Code to approve a tactical response plan developed in consultation with those officials pursuant to this subdivision. Any vote to approve the tactical response plan shall be announced in open session following the closed session.

(4) This subdivision does not reduce or eliminate the requirements of Section 32282.

(g) For
 purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Child abuse or neglect” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code.

(2) “Sex offense” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44010.

(3) “Small school district” means a school district that has fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance at the beginning of each fiscal year.

(4) “Violent crime” means any of the following:

(A) An act defined or described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (i) of Section 67381 and that is an act for which a pupil could or would be expelled pursuant to Section 48915.

(B) A violent
 felony pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(C) A serious felony pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 3.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

32282.

(a) The comprehensive school safety plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assessing the current status of crime committed on school campuses and at school-related functions.

(2) Identifying appropriate strategies and programs that will provide or maintain a high level of school safety and address the school’s procedures for complying with existing laws related to school safety, which shall include the development of all of the following:

(A) (i) Child abuse or neglect reporting procedures consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of
 the Penal Code.

(ii) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, or by no later than July 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to address the supervision and protection of children from child abuse or neglect or sex offenses.

(B) (i) Disaster procedures, routine and emergency, including adaptations for pupils with disabilities in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)). The disaster procedures shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(I) Establishing an earthquake emergency procedure system in every public school
 building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A school district or county office of education may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure system. The system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(ia) A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of pupils and staff. The department shall provide general direction to school districts and county offices of education on what to include in the school building disaster plan.

(ib) A drop procedure whereby each pupil and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to their knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least
 once a school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.

(ic) Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.

(id) A program to ensure that pupils and both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.

(II) Establishing a procedure to allow a public agency, including the American Red Cross, to use school buildings, grounds, and equipment for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare. The school district or county office of education shall cooperate with the public agency in furnishing and maintaining the services as the school district or county office of education may deem necessary to meet the needs of the
 community.

(III) (ia) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, establishing a procedure to identify appropriate refuge shelter for all pupils and staff to be used in the event of an evacuation order by local authorities and notify the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries of this identified refuge, in order to first prioritize the safety of pupils and staff, and then the defense of that structure in the event of a fire. Each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, shall coordinate the procedure with the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries. For those schools under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office
 of education, the school district or county office of education shall be the entity that coordinates with the operational area having jurisdiction within each of the school’s boundaries.

(ib) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the development by each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, of a communication and evacuation plan, to be used in the event of an early notice evacuation warning, that allows enough time to evacuate all pupils and staff. These plans shall clearly identify a decision process to determine whether an evacuation order is appropriate.

(ic) For purposes of this subclause, “operational area” means an
 intermediate level of the state emergency services organization, consisting of a county and all political subdivisions within the county area, that serves as a link in the system of communication and coordination between the state’s emergency operation centers and the operating centers of the political subdivisions that make up the operational area, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8559 of the Government Code and Section 8605 of the Government Code.

(ii) The evaluation of a comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) and the review of a school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, shall include ensuring that the plan includes appropriate adaptations for pupils with disabilities, as required pursuant to clause (i).

(iii) (I) After the first evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted, and after each annual evaluation or review thereafter, a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves may bring concerns about an individual pupil’s ability to access disaster safety procedures described in the comprehensive school safety plan or the school safety plan to the school principal. If the school principal determines there is merit to a concern, the principal shall direct the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, to make appropriate modifications to the comprehensive school safety plan or school safety plan, as applicable, during the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph
 (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable. The school principal may direct the schoolsite council, the school safety planning committee, or the charter school, as applicable, to make such modifications before the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.

(II) Subclause (I) does not prohibit a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves from bringing their concerns to the school principal before an evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is
 conducted.

(iv) All deliberations of the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, related to individual pupils with disabilities for purposes of the requirements of clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws regarding the privacy of pupil information.

(C) Policies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915 for pupils who committed an act listed in subdivision (c) of Section 48915 and other school-designated serious acts that would lead to suspension, expulsion, or mandatory expulsion recommendations pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 48900) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(D) Procedures to notify teachers of dangerous pupils pursuant to Section 49079.

(E) A discrimination and harassment policy consistent with the prohibition against discrimination contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.

(F) The provisions of any schoolwide dress code, pursuant to Section 35183, that prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel,” if the school has adopted that type of a dress code. For those purposes, the comprehensive school safety plan shall define “gang-related apparel.” The definition shall be limited to apparel that, if worn or displayed on a school campus, reasonably could be determined to threaten the health and safety of the school environment. A schoolwide dress code established pursuant to this section and Section 35183 shall be enforced on the school campus and at any school-sponsored activity by the principal of the school or the person designated by the principal. For purposes of this subparagraph,
 “gang-related apparel” shall not be considered a protected form of speech pursuant to Section 48950.

(G) Procedures for safe ingress and egress of pupils, parents, and school employees to and from school.

(H) A safe and orderly environment conducive to learning at the school.

(I) The rules and procedures on school discipline adopted pursuant to Sections 35291, 35291.5, 47605, and 47605.6.

(J) Procedures for conducting tactical responses to criminal incidents, including procedures related to individuals with guns on school campuses and at school-related functions. The procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants shall be based on the specific needs and context of each school and community.

(K) If a comprehensive school safety plan includes procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants by conducting a drill, a school shall comply with all of the following relating to the drill:

(i) (I) The school shall not conduct a high-intensity drill.

(II) For purposes of this clause, “high-intensity drill” means a drill that includes simulations that mimic an actual school shooter or other armed assailant incident, including, but not limited to, theatrical makeup or other materials to give an image of blood or gunshot wounds, acting by an individual posing to be the assailant, acting by individuals posing as victims, or simulations that instruct pupils to actively resist an assailant by throwing objects, attacking, or swarming the assailant.

(ii) The school shall not include the use of real weapons, gunfire blanks, or explosions in the conducting of the drill.

(iii) The school shall ensure a trauma-informed approach to the design and execution of any drill, which shall include all of the following:

(I) Age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drill content and terminology developed with the involvement of school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals.

(II) Notice to all parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel subject to the drills in advance of the drill and of the drill’s expected length of time.

(III) The ability for parents or guardians to opt their child or
 children out of the drills.

(IV) An announcement to pupils and educators immediately before the start of the drills and an announcement to pupils and educators immediately after the drills have concluded.

(V) A notice to all parents and guardians after the drill has concluded.

(VI) The provision of contact information for community-based resources, including local organizations with objectives to reduce gun violence or provide mental health counseling, to parents or guardians, pupils, and staff who are negatively impacted by the drills, and, where available, prioritizing school-based resources.

(L) Procedures to assess and respond to reports of any dangerous, violent, or unlawful activity that is being conducted or threatened to be conducted at the
 school, at an activity sponsored by the school, or on a schoolbus serving the school.

(M) (i) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated on or after July 1, 2025, procedures to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing a sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening medical emergency while on school grounds.

(ii) The procedures described in clause (i) are encouraged to integrate evidence-based core elements, including any cardiopulmonary resuscitation training offered and the placement of any automated external defibrillator available on the schoolsite in accordance with nationally recognized evidence-based emergency cardiac care guidelines, as dictated by the school safety plan.

(N) (i) When a comprehensive school safety plan
 is next reviewed and updated, but by no later than March 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to notify parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel when the school confirms the presence of immigration enforcement on the schoolsite.

(ii) The content and timing of a notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) shall consider the safety and well-being of the pupils, employees, and community members of the schoolsite when determining when and how to issue the notification to parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel.

(iii) The notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) may also include a hyperlink to additional resources for families with information about their educational rights, state laws that protects parents’ and students’ privacy and confidentiality, and, if available,
 counseling or support services, which may include services that support families impacted by immigration enforcement and model policies adopted by the local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 234.7.

(iv) A notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(v) For purposes of this subparagraph, “immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.

(O) For schools that serve pupils
 in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, a protocol in the event a pupil is suffering or is reasonably believed to be suffering from an opioid overdose.

(3) (A) Beginning July 1, 2025, an instructional continuity plan to establish communication with pupils and their families and provide instruction to pupils when in-person instruction is disrupted due to an emergency pursuant to Section 41422 or subdivision (a) of Section 46392. The plan shall include all the following:

(i) Procedures for pupil engagement, as soon as practicable, and no later than five calendar days following the emergency. Procedures shall be designed to establish two-way communication with pupils and their families and identify and provide supports for pupils’ social-emotional, mental health, and academic needs.

(ii) A plan to
 provide access to in-person instruction or remote instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5, as soon as practicable, but no later than 10 instructional days following the emergency. The plan may include support to pupils and families to enroll in or be temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(B) Local educational agencies are encouraged to plan to meet instructional standards that are at least equivalent to those applicable to independent study programs.

(C) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “temporarily reassigned” means temporarily reassigned to another local educational agency outside of the school district, but within the county or an immediately adjacent county, in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides. Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a pupil who is temporarily
 reassigned shall be deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for attendance in the local educational agency that is temporarily serving the pupil pursuant to this section.

(ii) Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil who is temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to this section in order to facilitate the timely reentry of the pupil in their prior school after the emergency event has ended.

(D) This paragraph applies to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that schools develop comprehensive school safety plans using existing resources, including the materials and
 services of the partnership, pursuant to this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that schools use the handbook developed and distributed in partnership by the department’s Safe Schools and Violence Prevention Center and the Attorney General’s Crime and Violence Prevention Center entitled “Safe Schools: A Planning Guide for Action” in conjunction with developing their plan for school safety.

(c) Each schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, in developing and updating a comprehensive school safety plan, shall, where practical, consult, cooperate, and coordinate with other schoolsite councils or school safety planning committees.

(d) The comprehensive school safety plan may be evaluated and amended, as needed, by the school safety planning committee, but shall be evaluated at least once a year, to ensure that the comprehensive school safety plan is
 properly implemented. An updated file of all safety-related plans and materials shall be readily available for inspection by the public.

(e) As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include policies and procedures aimed at the prevention of bullying.

(f) The comprehensive school safety plan, as written and updated by the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, shall be submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32288.

(g) The department shall maintain and conspicuously post on its internet website a compliance checklist for developing a comprehensive school safety plan, and shall update the checklist when necessary.

(h) On or before March 1, 2025, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website instructional continuity plan guidance, including guidance for continued academic and school engagement strategies during disruptions in instruction due to emergencies.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.5.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 15 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 460.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

32282.

(a) The comprehensive school safety plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assessing the current status of crime committed on school campuses and at school-related functions.

(2) Identifying appropriate strategies and programs that will provide or maintain a high level of school safety and address the school’s procedures for complying with existing laws related to school safety, which shall include the development of all of the following:

(A) (i) Child abuse or neglect reporting procedures consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of
 the Penal Code.

(ii) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, or by no later than July 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to address the supervision and protection of children from child abuse or neglect or sex offenses.

(B) (i) Disaster procedures, routine and emergency, including adaptations for pupils with disabilities in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)). The disaster procedures shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(I) Establishing an earthquake emergency procedure system in every public school
 building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A school district or county office of education may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure system. The system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(ia) A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of pupils and staff. The department shall provide general direction to school districts and county offices of education on what to include in the school building disaster plan.

(ib) A drop procedure whereby each pupil and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to their knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least
 once a school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.

(ic) Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.

(id) A program to ensure that pupils and both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.
